Tennessee statutes. Title 69 Waters, Waterways, Drains And Levees
Part 2

Corps of Engineers Water Projects

69-1-201. Immunity from damages — Exceptions.

The state of Tennessee, its departments or agencies, or any governmental entity is hereby authorized, as required by the secretary of the army or the chief of engineers for projects for water resource development and conservation or other purposes, to agree to hold and save the United States free from damages due to the construction or operation and maintenance of such projects, except for damages due to the fault or negligence of the United States or its contractors.

Acts 1988, ch. 617, § 1.

69-1-202. “Governmental entity” defined.

“Governmental entity” means any political subdivision of the state of Tennessee, including, but not limited to, any municipality, metropolitan government, county improvement district, drainage district, levee district or special district duly created and existing pursuant to the constitution and laws of Tennessee, or any instrumentality of government created by any one (1) or more of the local governmental entities named in this section or by an act of the general assembly.

Acts 1988, ch. 617, § 2.